Massachusetts, session 194th, S1867.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Option (d) of section 12 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in
the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 233, the words “or $500”
and inserting in place thereof the following words:- , $500 or $750.
SECTION 2. Said option (d) of said section 12 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by inserting after the word “commission.”, in line 258, the following
paragraph:-
Beginning July 1, 2025, the normal monthly member-survivor allowance provided for
under this option to a spouse of a deceased member shall not be less than $750 for members of
the state teachers’ and state employees’ retirement system. The provisions of this paragraph shall
of 2

take effect for the members of a retirement system of any other political subdivision by a
majority vote of the board of such system and by the local legislative body. For the purpose of
this paragraph, local legislative body shall mean a town meeting for a town system, the city
council subject to the provisions of its charter for a city system, the county retirement board
advisory council for a county system, the regional retirement board advisory council for a
regional system, the district members for a district system and the governing body of an authority
for an authority system. Acceptance shall be deemed to have occurred upon the filing of a
certification of such vote with the commission.
of 2